Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.160

Authorization to practice—Referral to appropriate practitioner—Standards of ethics—Electroneuromyographic examinations—Authorization to purchase, store, and administer certain drugs or medication.

(1) A physical therapist licensed under this chapter is fully authorized to practice physical therapy as defined in this chapter.

(2) A physical therapist shall refer persons under his or her care to appropriate health care practitioners if the physical therapist has reasonable cause to believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the scope of practice under this chapter or when physical therapy is contraindicated.

(3) Physical therapists and physical therapist assistants shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession and as further established by rule.

(4) A physical therapist may perform electroneuromyographic examinations for the purpose of testing neuromuscular function only by referral from an authorized health care practitioner identified in *RCW 18.74.010(7) and only upon demonstration of further education and training in electroneuromyographic examinations as established by rule. Within two years after July 1, 2005, the secretary shall waive the requirement for further education and training for those physical therapists licensed under this chapter who perform electroneuromyographic examinations.

(5) A physical therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase, store, and administer medications such as hydrocortisone, fluocinonide, topical anesthetics, silver sulfadiazine, lidocaine, magnesium sulfate, zinc oxide, and other similar medications, and may administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed by an authorized health care practitioner for the practice of physical therapy. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed physical therapist is not liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the physical therapist.

[ 2007 c 98 s 14; 2005 c 501 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.74.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (7) to subsection (1), effective July 1, 2015.